Missouri, session 2026, HB2170.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 307.179, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 307.179, to read as follows:
307.179. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Child booster seat", a seating system which meets the Federal Motor Vehicle
Safety Standards set forth in 49 C.F.R. 571.213, as amended, that is designed to elevate a
child to properly sit in a federally approved safety belt system;
(2) "Child passenger restraint system", a seating system which meets the Federal
Motor Vehicle Safety Standards set forth in 49 C.F.R. 571.213, as amended, and which is
either permanently affixed to a motor vehicle or is affixed to such vehicle by a safety belt or a
universal attachment system;
(3) "Driver", a person who is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle.
2. Every driver transporting a child under the age of sixteen years shall be
responsible, when transporting such child in a motor vehicle operated by that driver on the
streets or highways of this state, for providing for the protection of such child as follows:
(1) Children under three years of age shall be secured in a rear-facing child
passenger restraint system; except that such child may be secured in a forward-facing
child passenger restraint system when the child reaches the highest rear-facing weight
or height allowed by the manufacturer of the particular rear-facing system;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2170 2
(2) Except as provided under subdivision (1) of this subsection, children [less
than] under four years of age, regardless of weight, shall be secured in a child passenger
restraint system appropriate for that child;
[(2)] (3) Except as provided under subdivision (1) of this subsection, children
weighing less than forty pounds[, regardless of age,] and under eight years of age shall be
secured in a child passenger restraint system appropriate for that child;
[(3)] (4) Children at least four years of age but [less than] under eight years of age,
who also weigh [at least] forty pounds [but less than eighty pounds, and who are also less than
four feet, nine inches tall,] or more, shall be secured in a child passenger restraint system or
booster seat appropriate for that child;
[(4)] (5) Children at least eighty pounds [or children] and more than four feet, nine
inches in height, or at least eight years of age, shall be secured by a vehicle safety belt [or
booster seat appropriate for that child] in accordance with section 307.178;
[(5)] (6) A child who otherwise would be required to be secured in a booster seat may
be transported in the back seat of a motor vehicle while wearing only a lap belt if the back
seat of the motor vehicle is not equipped with a combination lap and shoulder belt for booster
seat installation[;
(6) When transporting children in the immediate family when there are more children
than there are seating positions in the enclosed area of a motor vehicle, the children who are
not able to be restrained by a child safety restraint device appropriate for the child shall sit in
the area behind the front seat of the motor vehicle unless the motor vehicle is designed only
for a front seat area. The driver transporting children referred to in this subsection is not in
violation of this section.

This subsection shall only apply to the use of a child passenger restraint system or vehicle
safety belt for children less than sixteen years of age being transported in a motor vehicle].
3. Any driver who violates subdivision (1), (2), [or] (3), or (4) of subsection 2 of this
section is guilty of an infraction and, upon conviction, may be punished by a fine of not more
than fifty dollars and court costs. Any driver who violates subdivision [(4)] (5) of subsection
2 of this section shall be subject to the penalty in subsection 6 of section 307.178. If a driver
receives a citation for violating subdivision (1), (2), [or] (3), or (4) of subsection 2 of this
section, the charges shall be dismissed or withdrawn if the driver prior to or at his or her
hearing provides evidence of acquisition of a child passenger restraint system or child booster
seat which is satisfactory to the court or the party responsible for prosecuting the driver's
citation.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any public carrier for hire. The
provisions of this section shall not apply to students four years of age or older who are

HB 2170 3
passengers on a school bus designed for carrying eleven passengers or more and which is
manufactured or equipped pursuant to Missouri Minimum Standards for School Buses as
school buses are defined in section 301.010.
5. The highways and transportation commission shall initiate and develop a program
of public information to develop understanding of, and ensure compliance with, the
provisions of this section.
✔